Massachusetts, session 194th, S417.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 3 the 
following new section:-  
Section 3A. (a) Except as otherwise herein provided, all students in grades kindergarten 
through eight attending a public or charter school in the commonwealth shall receive at least 
thirty consecutive minutes of supervised, safe, and unstructured free-play recess per school day 
which shall be held outdoors whenever the weather and air quality permits. If recess is held 
indoors due to weather or air quality, a public or charter school shall use an appropriate space 
that promotes physical activity. As used herein, the term "free-play recess" shall mean an 
unstructured environment that is supervised by appropriate school personnel or staff. 
(b) No public or charter school serving students in grades kindergarten through eight 
shall decrease the amount of time it allots and provides to students for free-play recess as a result 

of 2 12 of any changes in standards or curriculum that the school is required to or chooses to adopt and 
shall not withhold recess for the purposes of providing academic or other services under an 
individualized education plan, 504 or other student support service, including the completion of 
ordinary classroom work. The department shall not exclude recess from structured learning time 
requirements for students in grades kindergarten through eight and shall not increase the total 
number of hours required in the school year to meet the provisions of this section. 
(c) A public or charter school serving students in grades kindergarten through eight may 
provide less than thirty consecutive minutes of free-play recess on school days with delayed 
openings, early dismissals or other schedule changes that result in a school day that is shorter 
than a standard day in said public or charter school. The requirements of this section shall not 
apply to school days in which there is a field trip.